New York, session 2025-2026, A876.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 11-239.1 to read as follows: 3 § 11-239.1 Assessments following decreased valuation. For a period of 4 a year after a real property's market value has decreased, the assessed 5 value of such property shall be the lesser of the assessed value in the 6 prior year or the product of the assessment ratio times the market 7 value. This section shall apply only to class one and class two proper- 8 ties as such classes are defined in subdivision one of section eighteen 9 hundred two of the real property tax law. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03332-01-5